Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Theft and Related Offenses.

Collateral references. —

50 Am. Jur. 2d, Larceny, § 1 et seq.

52B C.J.S., Larceny, § 1 et seq.

Rights of owner of stolen money against one who won it in gambling transaction from thief, 44 ALR2d 1242.

Gambling or lottery paraphernalia as subject of larceny, 51 ALR2d 1396.

Stealing carcass as within statute making it larceny to steal cattle or livestock, 78 ALR2d 1100.

Taking, and pledging or pawning, another’s property as larceny, 82 ALR2d 863.

Stolen money or property as subject of larceny, 89 ALR2d 1435.

Attempts to commit offenses of larceny by trick, confidence game, false pretenses, and the like, 6 ALR3d 241.

Larceny: Entrapment or consent,
10 ALR3d 1121.

Single or separate larceny predicated upon stealing property from different owners at the same time, 37 ALR3d 1407.

Criminal offenses in connection with rental of motor vehicles, 38 ALR3d 949.

Purse snatching as robbery or theft,
42 ALR3d 1381.

Criminal prosecution based upon breaking into tr taking money or goods from vending machine or other coin operated machine,
45 ALR3d 1286.

Series of takings over a period of time as involving single or separate larcenies,
53 ALR3d 398.

Larceny as within disorderly conduct statute or ordinance, 71 ALR3d 1156.

What constitutes larceny “from a person,” 74 ALR3d 271.

Receiver of stolen goods as accomplice of thief for purposes of corroboration, 74 ALR3d 560.

What conduct amounts to an overt act or acts done toward commission of larceny so as to sustain charge of attempt to commit larceny, 76 ALR3d 842.

Retaking of money lost at gambling as robbery or larceny, 77 ALR3d 1363.

Criminal liability for wrongfully obtaining unemployment benefits, 80 ALR3d 1280.

Embezzlement, larceny, false pretenses or allied criminal fraud by a partner, 82 ALR3d 822.

Coercion, compulsion, or duress as defense to charge of robbery, larceny, or related crime, 1 ALR4th 481.

Retailer’s failure to pay to government sales or use tax funds as constituting larceny or embezzlement, 8 ALR4th 1068.

Criminal liability under state laws in connection with application for, or receipt of, public welfare payments, 22 ALR4th 534.

Necessity of conviction of offense associated with property seized to support forfeiture of property to state or local authorities,
38 ALR4th 515.

Criminal liability for theft of, interference with, or unauthorized use of, computer programs, files, or systems, 51 ALR4th 971.

Cat as subject of larceny, 55 ALR4th 1080.

Sec. 11.46.100.
Theft defined.

A person commits theft if

with intent to deprive another of property or to appropriate property of another to oneself or a third person, the person obtains the property of another;

the person commits theft of lost or mislaid property under AS

11.46.160

;

the person commits theft by deception under AS

11.46.180

;

the person commits theft by receiving under AS

11.46.190

;

the person commits theft of services under AS

11.46.200

; or

the person commits theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held under AS

11.46.210

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “deprive another of property,” “appropriate property of another to himself or a third person,” “property of another,” “obtain” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “property,” “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900

Consolidation of theft offenses - AS

11.46.110

—

11.46.150

Original Code Provision - None.

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Definition of “deprive another of property,” “appropriate property of another to himself or a third person,” “property of another,” “obtain” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “property,” “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900

For definitions of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.46.990

.

For definitions of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.46.990

.

Sec. 11.46.110.
Consolidation of theft offenses: Pleading and proof.

Each instance of conduct defined as theft under AS

11.46.100

constitutes theft in the first, second, third, or fourth degree.

An accusation of theft is sufficient if it alleges that the defendant committed theft of property or services of the nature or value required for the commission of the crime charged without designating the particular way or manner in which the theft was committed.

Proof that the defendant engaged in conduct constituting theft as defined in AS

11.46.100

is sufficient to support a conviction based upon any indictment, information, or complaint for theft.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

Degrees of theft - AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: III, 22-23.

Sec. 11.46.120.
Theft in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of theft in the first degree if the person commits theft as defined in AS

11.46.100

and the value of the property or services is $25,000 or more.

Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For additional penalty when theft is of commercial fishing gear, see
AS

16.05.710(b)

.

Sec. 11.46.130.
Theft in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of theft in the second degree if the person commits theft as defined in AS

11.46.100

and

the value of the property or services is $750 or more but less than $25,000;

the property is a firearm or explosive;

the property is taken from the person of another;

the property is taken from a vessel and is vessel safety or survival equipment;

the property is taken from an aircraft and the property is aircraft safety or survival equipment;

the value of the property is $250 or more but less than $750 and, within the preceding five years, the person has been convicted and sentenced on two or more separate occasions in this or another jurisdiction of

an offense under AS

11.46.120

, or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements;

a crime set out in this subsection or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements;

an offense under AS

11.46.140(a)(1)

, or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements; or

an offense under AS

11.46.220(c)(1)

or (c)(2)(A), or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements; or

the property is an access device or identification document.

In this section,

“aircraft” means a contrivance used or designed for navigation of flight in air;

“aircraft safety or survival equipment” means equipment required to be carried on an aircraft under AS

02.35.110

;

“vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water;

“vessel safety or survival equipment” means personal flotation devices; immersion suits; personal flotation device lights; survival craft; equipment necessary for the proper operation of survival craft; emergency position indicating radio beacons; fire extinguishers and supporting equipment; firefighters’ outfits; and self contained breathing apparatuses; in this paragraph, “survival craft” means a device designed to enable a person to survive the loss of a vessel, and includes buoyant apparatuses, inflatable buoyant apparatuses, life floats, inflatable life rafts, and auxiliary craft, including skiffs, usable as survival craft.

Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 131 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 56 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 6 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 16 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (b) enacted as (c).
Relettered in 1992, at which time former (b) was relettered as (c).
In 2002, in (b)(4) of this section, “paragraph” was substituted for “subparagraph” to correct a manifest error in ch. 131, SLA 1992.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For crime of possession of burglary tools with intent to commit crime referred to in paragraph (a)(3), see AS

11.46.315

.

For additional penalty when theft is of commercial fishing gear, see AS

16.05.710(b)

.

For provision relating to the applicability of 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(1), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(1), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(1), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “services” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”; in (a)(6), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “property” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”'.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(1) and (6), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “the value of the property or services” in (a)(1) and following “the value of the property” in (a)(6), and added “or identification document” at the end of (a)(7).

Editor's notes. —

Section 6, ch. 67, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 addition of paragraph (7) to (a) of this section “applies to offenses occurring on or after July 14, 2005.”

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 4, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.140.
Theft in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of theft in the third degree if the person commits theft as defined in AS

11.46.100

and

the value of the property or services is $250 or more but less than $750; or

[Repealed, § 5 ch 67 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 179 ch 36 SLA 2016.]

the value of the property is less than $250 and, within the preceding five years, the person has been convicted and sentenced on three or more separate occasions in this or another jurisdiction of theft or concealment of merchandise, or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements.

Theft in the third degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 133 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 67 SLA 2005; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 2014; am §§ 7, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 3 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 17 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(2), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(1), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “services” and substituted “$1,000” for $750“; repealed (a)(3).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(1), substituted “$750” for “$1,000” and added (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “the value of the property or services” in (a)(1).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 5, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of paragraph (a)(3) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.150.
Theft in the fourth degree.

A person commits the crime of theft in the fourth degree if the person commits theft as defined in AS

11.46.100

and the value of the property or services is less than $250.

Theft in the fourth degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 8 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 18 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “services,” “firearm,” “explosive,” “credit card” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

Consolidation of theft offenses: pleading and proof - AS

11.46.110

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts - AS

11.46.980

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Robbery in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.500

,

11.41.510

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.140

-510; AS 11.15.250.

TD: III, 24-27.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(3), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), inserted '', adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,'' following ''services''.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “the value of the property or services” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 6, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.160.
Theft of lost or mislaid property.

A person commits theft of lost or mislaid property if the person obtains property of another knowing that the property was lost, mislaid, or delivered under a mistake as to the nature or amount of the property or the identity of the recipient and the person fails to take reasonable measures to restore the property to the owner with intent to deprive the owner of the property.

As used in this section “reasonable measures” includes notifying the identified owner or a peace officer.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “peace officer” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “obtain,” “property of another,” “deprive” - AS

11.46.990

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

(2)

Consolidation of theft offenses: pleading and proof - AS

11.46.110

Theft in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.260.

TD: III, 28-30.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Section would apply to the disposition of a nondomestic animal found wandering loose and not endangering human life. August 29, 1979, Op. Att’y Gen., rendered under former AS 11.20.260.

Sec. 11.46.180.
Theft by deception.

A person commits theft by deception if, with intent to deprive another of property or to appropriate property of another to oneself or a third person, the person obtains the property of another by deception.

In a prosecution based on theft by deception, if the state seeks to prove that the defendant used deception by promising performance which the defendant did not intend to perform or knew would not be performed, that intent or knowledge may not be established solely by or inferred solely from the fact that the promise was not performed.

As used in this section, “deception” has the meaning ascribed to it in AS

11.81.900

but does not include falsity as to matters having no pecuniary significance or “puffing” by statements unlikely to deceive reasonable persons in the group addressed.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “deception” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “deprive another of property,” “appropriate property of another to himself or a third person,” “property of another,” “obtains” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

(3)

Consolidation of theft offenses: pleading and proof - AS

11.46.110

Theft in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

Scheme to defraud - AS

11.46.600

Deceptive business practices - AS

11.46.710

Deceiving a machine - AS

11.46.985

Original Code Provisions - AS

11.20.360

; AS 11.20.380; AS 11.20.390; AS 11.20.450.

TD: III, 30-34.

For provisions establishing the making of a false or misleading statement for the purpose of obtaining or denying a workers’ compensation benefit or payment as theft by deception, see AS

23.30.250

.

Sec. 11.46.190.
Theft by receiving.

A person commits theft by receiving if the person buys, receives, retains, conceals, or disposes of stolen property with reckless disregard that the property was stolen.

As used in this section, “receives” includes acquiring possession, control, or title, or lending on the security of the property.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “stolen property” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “property” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

(4)

Consolidation of theft offenses: pleading and proof - AS

11.46.110

Theft in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.350

.

TD: III, 34-36.

Sec. 11.46.200.
Theft of services.

A person commits theft of services if

the person obtains services, known by that person to be available only for compensation, by deception, force, threat, or other means to avoid payment for the services;

having control over the disposition of services of others to which the person is not entitled, the person knowingly diverts those services to the person’s own benefit or to the benefit of another not entitled to them; or

the person obtains the use of computer time, a computer system, a computer program, a computer network, or any part of a computer system or network, with reckless disregard that the use by that person is unauthorized.

Absconding without paying for hotel, restaurant, or other services for which compensation is customarily paid immediately upon the receiving of them is prima facie evidence that the services were obtained by deception.

A person may not be prosecuted under this section for theft of cable, microwave, subscription, or pay television or other telecommunications service if the service was obtained through the use of a device designed and used to intercept electromagnetic signals directly from a satellite, including a device commonly referred to as a home earth station.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

Definition of “services,” “deception,” “force,” “threat,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900

Definition of “obtain,” “access,” “computer,” “computer network,” “computer system,” “computer program,” “data” - AS

11.46.990

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

(5)

Consolidation of theft offenses - AS

11.46.110

—

11.46.150

Criminal mischief in the third degree - AS

11.46.484

Criminal use of a computer - AS

11.46.740

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.480; AS 11.20.495.

TD: III, 39-41.

For crime of possession of burglary tools with intent to commit theft of services, see AS

11.46.315

.

Sec. 11.46.210.
Theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held.

A person commits theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held if the person

obtains property from anyone or personal services from an employee upon an agreement or subject to a known legal obligation to make specified payment or other disposition to a third person, whether from that property or its proceeds or from the person’s own property to be reserved in equivalent amount; and

exercises control over the property or services as the person’s own and fails to make the required payment or disposition.

It is not a defense to a prosecution based on theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held that it may be impossible to identify particular property as belonging to the victim at the time of the defendant’s failure to make the required payment or disposition.

In a prosecution based on theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held, the fact that the defendant was a fiduciary or an officer or employee of a government or a financial institution is prima facie evidence

that the defendant exercised control over property or services as the defendant’s own if the defendant failed to pay or account upon lawful demand or if an audit reveals a shortage or falsification of accounts; and

that the defendant knew any legal obligation relevant under (a)(1) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “services,” “fiduciary,” “government” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “financial institution,” “obtains” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “knowingly” -
AS

11.81.900(a)

Theft defined - AS

11.46.100

(6)

Consolidation of theft offenses: pleading and proof - AS

11.46.110

Theft in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

Misapplication of property - AS

11.46.620

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: III, 41-42.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.46.220.
Concealment of merchandise.

A person commits the crime of concealment of merchandise if without authority the person knowingly conceals on or about the person the merchandise of a commercial establishment, not purchased by the person, while still upon the premises of the commercial establishment, with intent to deprive the owner of the merchandise or with intent to appropriate the merchandise.

Merchandise found concealed upon or about the person which has not been purchased by the person is prima facie evidence of a knowing concealment.

Concealment of merchandise is

a class C felony if

the merchandise is a firearm;

the value of the merchandise is $750 or more; or

the value of the merchandise is $250 or more but less than $750 and, within the preceding five years, the person has been convicted and sentenced on two or more separate occasions in this or another jurisdiction of

the offense of concealment of merchandise under this paragraph or (2)(A) of this subsection, or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements; or

an offense under AS

11.46.120

,

11.46.130

, or

11.46.140(a)(1)

, or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements;

a class A misdemeanor if

the value of the merchandise is $250 or more but less than $750; or

[Repealed, § 179 ch 36 SLA 2016.]

the value of the merchandise is less than $250 and, within the preceding five years, the person has been convicted and sentenced on three or more separate occasions of the offense of concealment of merchandise or theft in any degree, or an offense under another law or ordinance with similar elements;

a class B misdemeanor if the value of the merchandise is less than $250.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 11 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 133 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 49 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 2005; am § 7 ch 12 SLA 2006; am § 7 ch 83 SLA 2014; am §§ 9, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 4 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 19 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 185(a)(4), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 75(a)(3), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (c)(1)(B), (1)(C), and (2)(A), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “merchandise” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750'”; in (c)(3), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “merchandise”; repealed (c)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (c)(1)(B), (c)(1)(C) and (c)(2) substituted “$750” for “$1,000”, and added (c)(2)(C).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “the value of the merchandise” in (c)(1)(B), (c)(1)(C), (c)(2)(A) and (c)(3).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (c) as amended by sec. 7, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (c) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.230.
Reasonable detention as defense.

In a civil or criminal action upon the complaint of a person who has been detained in or in the immediate vicinity of a commercial establishment for the purpose of investigation or questioning as to the ownership of merchandise, it is a defense that

the person was detained in a reasonable manner and for not more than a reasonable time to permit investigation or questioning by a peace officer or by the owner of the commercial establishment or the owner’s agent; and

the peace officer, owner, or owner’s agent had probable cause to believe that the person detained was committing or attempting to commit concealment of merchandise or theft from the commercial establishment.

As used in this section, “reasonable time” means the time necessary to permit the person detained to make a statement or refuse to make a statement, and any additional time necessary to examine employees and records of the commercial establishment relative to the ownership of the merchandise.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 12 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “deprive” - AS

11.46.990

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts - AS

11.46.980

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.275; AS 11.20.277.

TD: III, 42-43.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43(f), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of (a) of this section “applies to offenses occurring and actions arising on or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 12, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (a) of this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 11.46.260.
Removal of identification marks.

A person commits the crime of removal of identification marks if, with intent to cause interruption to the ownership of another, the person defaces, erases, or otherwise alters or attempts to deface, erase, or otherwise alter any serial number or identification mark placed or inscribed on a propelled vehicle, bicycle, firearm, movable or immovable construction tool or equipment, appliance, merchandise, or other article or its component parts.

Removal of identification marks is

a class C felony if the value of the property on which the serial number or identification mark appeared is $750 or more;

a class A misdemeanor if the value of the property on which the serial number or identification mark appeared is $250 or more but less than $750;

a class B misdemeanor if the value of the property on which the serial number or identification mark appeared is less than $250.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 10 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 5 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 20 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, AS 12.655.135(b) for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 185(a)(5), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 75(a)(4), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (b)(1), (2) and (3), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “appeared” and, in (b)(1) and (2), substituted “$1,000” for “$750”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (b)(1) and (2), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “identification mark appeared” in (b)(1), (b)(2) and (b)(3).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (b) as amended by sec. 8, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.270.
Unlawful possession.

A person commits the crime of unlawful possession if the person possesses a propelled vehicle, bicycle, firearm, movable or immovable construction tool or equipment, appliance, merchandise or other article or its component parts knowing that the serial number or identification mark placed on it by the manufacturer or owner for the purpose of identification has been defaced, erased, or otherwise altered with the intent of causing interruption to the ownership of another.

Unlawful possession is

a class C felony if the value of the property on which the serial number or identification mark appeared is $750 or more;

a class A misdemeanor if the value of the property on which the serial number or identification mark appeared is $250 or more but less than $750;

a class B misdemeanor if the value of the property on which the serial number or identification mark appeared is less than $250.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 11 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 6 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 21 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “propelled vehicle,” “firearm,” “possess” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Theft by deception - AS

11.46.180

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts - AS

11.46.980

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Original Code Provision - None.

For imprisonment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

.

For imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

.

For imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 185(a)(6), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 75(a)(5), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (b)(1) and (2), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “appeared” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”; in (b)(3), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (b)(1) and (2), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “identification mark appeared” in (b)(1), (b)(2) and (b)(3).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (b) as amended by sec. 9, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.280.
Issuing a bad check.

A person commits the crime of issuing a bad check if the person issues a check knowing that it will not be honored by the drawee.

In a prosecution under this section, it is prima facie evidence that the drawer knew the check would not be honored by the drawee if

payment of the check was refused by the drawee for lack of funds upon presentation within 30 days after issue, and the drawer failed to make full satisfaction of the amount due within 15 days after notice of dishonor was deposited as first class mail, addressed to the drawer at the address appearing on the dishonored check or the drawer’s last known address; or

the drawer had no account with the drawee at the time the check was issued.

In this section,

“amount due” means the face amount of the dishonored check plus all costs and protest fees assessed by the drawee;

“check” means a draft, check, or similar sight order for the payment of money, but does not include a postdated check or a promissory note;

a person “issues” a check when as a drawer the person delivers it or causes it to be delivered to a person who thereby acquires a right against the drawer with respect to the check; a person who draws a check with the intent that it be so delivered is considered to have issued it if the delivery occurs.

Issuing a bad check is

a class B felony if the face amount of the check is $25,000 or more;

a class C felony if the face amount of the check is $750 or more but less than $25,000;

a class A misdemeanor if the face amount of the check is $250 or more but less than $750;

a class B misdemeanor if the face amount of the check is less than $250.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 12 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 7 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 22 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “knowingly” -
AS

11.81.900(a)

Theft by deception - AS

11.46.180

Determination of “value”; aggregation of amounts - AS

11.46.980

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.210; 11.20.220; AS 11.20.230; AS 11.20.240; AS 11.20.250.

TD: V, 28-31.

For punishment of unclassified felonies under AS

11.66.110(a)(2)

, see AS

12.55.125(i)

.

For class A felonies under AS

11.66.120(a)(3)

, see AS

12.55.125(c)

, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (d), see sec. 185(a)(7), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the first 2017 amendment to subsection (d), see sec. 29, ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the second 2017 amendment to subsection (d), see sec. 75(a)(6), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (d)(1) and (4), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “check”; in (d)(2) and (3), inserted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “check” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750.”

The first 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (d)(1), deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “face amount of the check”.

The second 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (d)(2) and (3), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “amount of the check” in (d)(2), (d)(3) and (d)(4).

Editor’s notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (d) as amended by sec. 10, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (d) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”